Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3414
Effect of transfer on death deed
during transferor's life.

During a transferor's life, a transfer on death deed does
not:

(1) Affect
an interest or right of the transferor or any other owner, including the right
to transfer or encumber the property;

(2) Affect an interest or right of a transferee,
even if the transferee has actual or constructive notice of the deed;

(3) Affect
an interest or right of a secured or unsecured creditor or future creditor
of the transferor, even if the creditor has actual or constructive notice
of the deed;

(4) Affect the transferor's or designated beneficiary's eligibility
for any form of public assistance except to the extent provided in section
76-3421;

(5) Create a legal or equitable interest in favor of the designated
beneficiary; or

(6) Subject the property to claims or process of a creditor of the
designated beneficiary.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 14.